Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4409
Activation.

(1) Unless a principal designates otherwise in the advance mental health care directive, a directive becomes active when the principal loses capacity. Activation is the point at which the directive shall be used as the basis for decisionmaking and shall dictate mental health treatment of the principal.

(2) The principal may designate in the directive an activation standard other than incapacity by describing the circumstances under which the directive becomes active.

Laws 2020, LB247, § 9.